Massachusetts, session 194th, H5632.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 12B of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as amended by section 155 of chapter 
102 of the acts of 2026, is hereby further amended by inserting after subsection (k) the following 
subsection:-  
(k½) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any municipal school 
district operating pursuant to a tuition agreement, and not a regional school district agreement, 
for middle and high school education, may exempt incoming school choice students at the 
elementary level from participation in the tuition agreement.